Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.18.212

Clean energy technology—Evaluation of policies.

(1) Each biennium, in consultation with the clean energy technology workforce advisory committee established in RCW 28C.18.210 and, at minimum, the department of commerce and the employment security department, the board shall evaluate the workforce impact of Washington's climate policies, including:

(a) Labor market trends and current and projected workforce demand in both traditional and clean energy technology professions, and restructuring of jobs and adjusted skillsets associated with climate change mitigation policies;

(b) The wage and benefits range of jobs within the clean energy technology sector;

(c) Demographics of the traditional and clean energy technology sectors;

(d) An inventory of skills needed in clean energy technology jobs, an analysis of how the skills and training of the existing workforce can fill those needs, and identification of additional workforce development needs in this sector; and

(e) Key challenges that could emerge under multiple future decarbonization scenarios based on factors such as rates of adoption of various new energy technologies; growth in demand for clean electricity; and changes in energy production and availability from both in-state and out-of-state sources.

(2) The board shall consult with career connect Washington authorized under chapter 28C.30 RCW, and shall conduct a literature review of the existing models, data, and study findings related to the evaluation in subsection (1) of this section to ensure a duplication of efforts does not occur.

[ 2023 c 231 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 231: See note following RCW 43.41.470.